Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6021.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 401. (1) Unless the amount of a fee is established under a specific article of this act, the department by rule shall establish the specific amounts of the fees charged for licenses, permits, and other activities under this act. (2) If the department receives a written request and the applicable fee, the department shall issue a license verification for a current license issued under this act. (3) If the department receives an application for licensure from an individual who has been adjudicated by a court or the department to have violated section 608 and the application is the individual's first application for licensure under this act after the violation, the application fee for licensure is 3 times the standard application fee. Sec. 601. (1) A person shall not engage in or attempt to engage in the practice of an occupation regulated under this act or use a title designated in this act unless the person possesses a license issued by the department for the occupation. (2) Subject to section 411, a person whose license is suspended, revoked, or lapsed, as determined by the records of the department, is considered unlicensed. (3) A person that violates subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00 or imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both. (4) A person that violates subsection (1) a second time is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both. (5) A person that violates subsection (1) a third or subsequent time is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than $25,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or both. (6) The remedies or penalties imposed for a violation of subsection (1) may include a requirement that restitution be made, based on proofs submitted to and findings made by the trier of fact as provided by law. (7) Notwithstanding the existence and pursuit of any other remedy or penalty, an affected person may pursue an action for injunctive relief to restrain or prevent a person from violating subsection (1). If successful in obtaining injunctive relief, the affected person is entitled to actual costs and attorney fees. As used this subsection, "affected person" means a person that is directly affected by the actions of another person that is suspected of violating subsection (1) and includes, but is not limited to, a licensee, a board, the department, a person that has utilized the services of the person suspected of violating subsection (1), or a private association that is composed primarily of members of the occupation in which the person is engaging in or attempting to engage in or in which the person is using a title designated under this act without a license under this act. (8) If construction is being undertaken contrary to a building permit, this act, or other applicable laws or ordinances, the enforcing agency shall give written notice to the person that holds the building permit, or if a permit has not been issued then to the person doing the construction, notifying that person of the violation of this act, or other applicable laws and ordinances, and that the person should appear and show cause why the construction should not be stopped. If the person doing the construction is not known, or cannot be located with reasonable effort, the enforcing agency may deliver the notice to the individual in charge of, or apparently in charge of, the construction. If the holder of the permit or the person doing the construction fails to appear and show good cause within 1 full working day after notice is delivered, the enforcing agency shall cause a written order to stop construction to be posted on the premises. A person shall not continue, or cause or allow to be continued, construction in violation of a stop construction order, except with permission of the enforcing agency to abate the dangerous condition or remove the violation, or except by court order. If an order to stop construction is not obeyed, the enforcing agency may apply to the circuit court for the county in which the premises are located for an order enjoining the violation of the stop construction order. This remedy is in addition to, and not in limitation of, any other remedy provided by law or ordinance, and does not prevent criminal prosecution for failure to obey the order. (9) An investigation may be conducted under article 5 to enforce this section. A person that violates this section is subject to the penalties and remedies provided under this section and under sections 511, 603, including, but not limited to, imposition of an administrative fine under section 603(e), and 611. (10) The remedies under this section are independent and cumulative. The use of 1 remedy by a person does not bar the use of other lawful remedies by that person or the use of a lawful remedy by another person. (11) If a conviction under subsection (3), (4), or (5) is entered by a court, the court shall notify the department by mail, facsimile transmission, or electronic mail.email. (12) The attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of a county may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce this section. Sec. 608. A person shall not alter or fraudulently use a license card or registration card issued under this act. An individual who violates this section is subject to all of the following: (a) A civil fine of not more than $1,000.00. (b) Ineligibility to be granted a license or to be registered under this act for 3 years after the date of the violation. (c) If the individual applies to be licensed or registered under this act after the violation, an increase in the application fee to 3 times the standard application fee. Sec. 737. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this article or in subsection (3), a person shall not engage in the business of electrical contracting unless the person has received from the board or from the appropriate municipality an electrical contractor's license. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this article or in subsection (3), an individual, other than an individual who is licensed under this article and employed by and working under the direction of a holder of an electrical contractor's license, shall not in any manner undertake to execute any electrical wiring. (3) A licensee is not required to perform any of the following classes of work: (a) Minor repair work. (b) The installation, alteration, repairing, rebuilding, or remodeling of elevators, dumbwaiters, escalators, or man lifts performed under a permit issued by an elevator inspection agency of this state or a municipality of this state. (c) The installation, alteration, or repair of electrical equipment and its associated wiring installed on the premises of consumers or subscribers by or for an electrical energy supply or communication agency for use by that agency in the generation, transmission, distribution, or metering of electrical energy or for the operation of signals or transmission of intelligence. (d) The installation, alteration, or repair of electrical wiring for the generation and primary distribution of electric current, or the secondary distribution system up to and including the meters, if that work is an integral part of the system owned and operated by an electric light and power utility in rendering its duly authorized service. (e) Any work involved in the manufacture of electric equipment, including the testing and repairing of that manufactured equipment. (f) The installation, alteration, or repair of equipment and its associated wiring for the generation or distribution of electric energy for the operation of signals or transmission of intelligence if that work is performed in connection with a communication system owned or operated by a telephone or telegraph company in rendering its authorized service as a telephone or telegraph company. (g) Any installation, alteration, or repair of electrical equipment by a homeowner in a single family home and accompanying outbuildings owned and occupied or to be occupied by the individual who is performing the installation, alteration, or repair of electrical equipment. (h) Any work involved in the use, maintenance, operation, dismantling, or reassembling of motion picture and theatrical equipment used in any building with approved facilities for entertainment or educational use and that has the necessary permanent wiring and floor and wall receptacle outlets designed for the proper and safe use of that theatrical equipment, but not including any permanent wiring. (i) Work performed by a person that is licensed as a mechanical contractor in a classification described in section 807(2)(a), 807(3)(a), (b), (d), (e), and (f), a person that is licensed as a plumbing contractor under article 11, and employees of those persons, while performing maintenance, service, repair, replacement, alteration, modification, reconstruction, or upgrading of control wiring circuits and electrical component parts in existing mechanical systems defined in the Michigan mechanical code and the Michigan plumbing code, including, but not limited to, energy management systems, relays and controls on boilers, water heaters, furnaces, air conditioning compressors and condensers, fan controls, thermostats and sensors, and all interconnecting wiring associated with the mechanical systems in buildings that are on the load side of the unit disconnect, that is located on or immediately adjacent to the equipment, except for life safety systems wiring. (j) Electrical wiring associated with the installation, removal, alteration, or repair of a water well pump on a single family dwelling to the first point of attachment in the house from the well, by a pump installer registered under part 127 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.12701 to 333.12771. (k) The installation, maintenance, or servicing of security alarm systems in a building or structure. As used in this subdivision, "security alarm system" means that term as defined in section 733(2)(c).733. (l) The installation, maintenance, or servicing of listed residential and commercial lawn irrigation equipment, except any permanent wired connections exceeding 30 volts. (m) The installation, maintenance, or servicing of listed landscape lighting systems and equipment, except any permanent wired connections exceeding 30 volts. (n) The installation, alteration, maintenance, or repair of electric signs and related wiring by an unlicensed individual under the direct supervision of a licensed sign specialist except that the ratio of unlicensed individuals engaged in this activity shall must not exceed 2 unlicensed individuals to 1 licensed sign specialist. An enforcing agency shall enforce this ratio on a jobsite basis. (o) The construction, installation, maintenance, repair, and renovation of telecommunications equipment and related systems by a person that is primarily engaged in the telecommunications and related information systems industry. This exemption does not include the construction, installation, maintenance, repair, or renovation of a fire alarm system. Sec. 801. As used in this article: (a) "Acceptance testing" means work that verifies the aboveground and underground piping of an automatic fire suppression system was installed in accordance with the Michigan building code and includes, but is not limited to, all of the following work: (i) Flushing. (ii) Hydrostatic testing of piping. (iii) Operational testing on a newly installed automatic fire suppression system, including, but not limited to, a test of 1 or more of the following: (A) Air pressure. (B) A backflow preventer. (C) A deluge trip. (D) A dry pipe. (E) A fire pump. (F) A main drain. (G) A preaction valve. (H) A pressure reducing valve. (I) A water flow alarm. (J) A fire loop. (b) "AFSA" means the American Fire Sprinkler Association. (c) (a) "Air conditioning" means the process of treating air to meet the requirements of a conditioned space by controlling, either simultaneously or individually, the air's temperature, humidity, cleanness, and distribution. (d) "Apprentice mechanical technician" means an individual who is engaged in learning about and assisting in the installation or servicing of mechanical equipment and who is employed by and under the direct and on-site supervision of a journey mechanical technician or mechanical contractor. (e) "Automatic fire suppression system" means either of the following: (i) A fire sprinkler system that is for a residential or commercial building and is designed and installed in accordance with the Michigan building code, and consists of piping that conveys air, foam, or water, regardless of whether any other agent is conveyed, to an opening or a device that contains, controls, or extinguishes a fire. (ii) A fire sprinkler system that is for a commercial building that consists of aboveground and underground piping, includes a water supply or connection to water that begins on the supply side of a gate valve located at or near the property line for which the system is used, and provides water to a fire sprinkler system described in subparagraph (i) only. (f) "Automatic fire suppression system inspection" means a visual examination of an automatic fire suppression system to verify that the automatic fire suppression system appears to be in operating condition and free of damage. (g) "Automatic fire suppression system installation" means acceptance testing or the adjustment, dismantlement, modification, repair, replacement, or servicing of an automatic fire suppression system. Automatic fire suppression system installation includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (i) Assembling metal or nonmetal pipe fittings, including, but not limited to, brass, copper, glass, lead, or plastic pipe fittings, for an automatic fire suppression system. (ii) Joining pipes for an automatic fire suppression system in any way, including, but not limited to, any of the following ways: (A) Brazing. (B) Caulking. (C) Cementing. (D) Fusing. (E) Grooving. (F) Soldering. (G) Threading. (H) Wiping. (iii) Securing the pipes of an automatic fire suppression system to a structure by any means, including, but not limited to, any of the following means: (A) A bracket. (B) A clamp. (C) A hanger. (D) A weld. (h) "Automatic fire suppression system maintenance test" means a periodic and physical test of an automatic fire suppression system to determine the operational status of a component in the automatic fire suppression system, including, but not limited to, a test of 1 or more of the following: (i) An alarm. (ii) A dry pipe, deluge, or preaction valve trip. (iii) A fire pump. (iv) Water flow. (i) (b) "Board" means the board of mechanical rules described in section 805. (j) (c) "Cooling" means air conditioning. as defined in subdivision (a). (k) (d) "Ductwork" means the air distribution arrangement for supply, return, and exhaust in air conditioning systems and in nonair conditioning systems, the materials and methods of which are specified in the Michigan mechanical code, or an equivalent nationally recognized model mechanical code. Ductwork includes flues, vents, and chimneys. (l) "Fire inspector" means an individual who is employed by this state or a local unit of government to enforce the automatic fire suppression system law of this state under this article and the Michigan building code. (m) "Fire sprinkler contractor" means an individual who holds a mechanical contractor's license with a fire suppression classification under this article. (n) (e) "Fire suppression system" means an integrated combination of a fire alarm system and fire suppression equipment that as a result of predetermined temperature, rate of temperature rise, products of combustion, flame, or human intervention will discharge a fire extinguishing substance over a fire area. (o) (f) "Heating", used alone, means the use of any fuel or electricity to generate heat in an air conditioning system. When used with a qualifying term such as "hydronic", the term heating assumes the limited meaning expressed by that qualification. (p) (g) "Heating, ventilating, and air conditioning" or "HVAC" means the application of equipment and systems to provide air conditioning for occupants of buildings and structures. HVAC does not include the installation of portable self-contained refrigeration equipment and window-type air conditioners of not more than 1-1/2 horsepower. (q) (h) "Hydronic heating and cooling" means the application of equipment and systems which that provide air conditioning by the controlled forced circulation of fluids or vapors in pipes. (r) "Journey mechanical technician" means an individual who is qualified to engage in the practical installation or servicing of mechanical equipment and is employed by and under the supervision of a licensed mechanical contractor. Sec. 803. As used in this article: (a) "Limited heating service" means the servicing of gas-designed sectional boilers that have inputs of not more than 1 million British thermal units, utilizing a combustion safeguard designed to shut off the main gas supply 10 or more seconds after pilot flame failure, and all other gas-fired or solid-fuel equipment and systems limited to input ratings of less than 400,000 British thermal units per unit; or oil-fired equipment and systems designed for the use of number 1 or number 2 fuel oil, that has a maximum firing rate of less than 5 gallons per hour per unit; or electrical furnaces and electric boilers that use the same kilowatts that are equivalent to the fossil fuel British thermal units generated. (b) "Limited refrigeration and air conditioning service" means the servicing of refrigeration equipment and systems and air conditioning equipment and systems employing the refrigeration cycle of unlimited capacity utilizing group 1 refrigerants as listed in the Michigan mechanical code or an equivalent nationally recognized model mechanical code. (c) "Mechanical contractor" means an individual who is qualified to engage in and supervise the installation and servicing of mechanical equipment and is engaged in the business of mechanical contracting for a fixed sum, price, fee percentage, valuable consideration, or other compensation. (d) "Mechanical work" means installing or servicing mechanical equipment including hydronic heating and cooling process piping, HVAC equipment, ductwork, refrigeration, limited heating services, limited refrigeration and air conditioning service, unlimited refrigeration and air conditioning service, or fire suppression systems. (e) "NFSA" means the National Fire Sprinkler Association. (f) (c) "Process piping" means any piping which that is not part of a system designed to provide air conditioning or of a refrigeration system. Process piping includes, but is not limited to, pipes that transfer chemicals and other fluids, gases, or vapors for systems other than air conditioning systems as covered by the Michigan mechanical code or an equivalent nationally recognized model mechanical code. (g) (d) "Refrigeration" means the use of equipment and systems, including, but not limited to, refrigeration piping, employing the refrigeration cycle to generate low temperatures for other than air conditioning equipment and systems. Refrigeration includes, but is not limited to, equipment and systems such as supermarket refrigeration, industrial refrigeration, the preservation of biological materials, and food storage facilities. Refrigeration does not include the installation of portable self-contained units such as refrigerators, dehumidifiers, and other similar equipment of not more than 1.5 horsepower or other equipment exempted from the Michigan mechanical code. (h) "Registered fire sprinkler program" means an apprenticeship program that is not less than 4 years long, is registered with the United States Department of Labor or this state, and involves not less than 8,000 hours of documented practical experience in automatic fire suppression system installation and not less than 280 hours of classroom, shop, or other related instruction in the fire suppression trade. (i) (e) "Servicing" means the maintenance, repair, and servicing of previously installed equipment and systems. (j) (f) "Specialty license" means a license issued under this article that allows the licensee to perform work within limits established by the board in 1 or more of the work classifications described in section 807(2).807(3). (k) "Sprinkler fitter journeyperson" means an individual who is licensed under section 814. (l) (g) "Unlimited heating service" means the servicing of heating equipment and systems without restrictions concerning thermal capacity or grade of fuel oil or type of fuel. (m) (h) "Unlimited refrigeration and air conditioning service" means the servicing of refrigeration equipment and systems and air conditioning equipment and systems employing the refrigeration cycle unlimited as to thermal capacity or type of refrigerant. (n) "Water supply" means any of the following: (i) A fire pump. (ii) A gravity tank. (iii) A pressure tank. (iv) A reservoir. (v) A public water source. (vi) A well. Sec. 805. (1) The board of mechanical rules created in section 3 of former 1984 PA 192 shall continue continues in existence and is designated as the board for purposes of this article. (2) The board shall must consist of the state fire marshal or the state fire marshal's designee, who is a permanent member, and 14 12 residents of the this state, appointed by the governor. All of the following apply to the appointed members of the board: (a) An appointed member shall must be at least not less than 18 years old.of age. (b) Except for the representative of the general public, an appointed member shall must be qualified in his or her the appointed member's respective field. (c) The appointed members of the board shall must include all of the following: (i) An individual representing the general public. (ii) A member of organized labor who represents the mechanical trades. (ii) A mechanical contractor with an HVAC classification who is licensed under this article. (iii) A mechanical contractor with a fire suppression classification who is licensed under this article. (iv) A mechanical contractor with a refrigeration classification who is licensed under this article. (v) A sprinkler fitter journeyperson who is licensed under this article. (vi) (iii) A professional mechanical engineer who is licensed under article 20 of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.2001 to 339.2014, as a professional engineer. (iv) A representative of an energy-producing public utility of the state. (v) A representative from each of the work classifications described in section 807(2). (vii) (vi) Two chief One mechanical inspectors inspector of a governmental subdivisions, 1 of whom enforces the building officials and code administrators building code, and 1 of whom enforces the international conference of building officials building code.subdivision. (viii) A water tube or fire tube boiler manufacturer. (ix) A member of organized labor who represents the mechanical trades. (x) A member of organized labor who represents a relevant trade in this state. (xi) A member of organized labor in this state that engages in the design, erection, fabrication, installation, operation, repair, or inspection of boilers. (xii) A mechanical contractor with experience in boiler installation, piping, operations, and repair, or a member who represents owners and users of power boilers that operate at least 1,000 pounds-force per square inch. (3) At the first meeting of each year, the board shall elect from its the board's membership a vice-chairperson and secretary. The vice-chairperson and secretary shall be are elected from those the members appointed to the board by the governor, except that the board members who are chief mechanical inspectors are not eligible for election as vice-chairperson of the board. The governor shall designate 1 member of the board to serve as chairperson at the pleasure of the governor. (4) Eight A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. An approval, decision, or ruling of the board does not become is not effective unless approved by 2/3 of the board members attending a meeting. (5) The board may recommend to the state construction code commission the promulgation of rules the board considers necessary for the safe design, construction, installation, alteration, servicing, and inspection of systems used in compliance with the Michigan mechanical code, and may recommend modifications, additions, or deletions to this act to update and maintain this act as an effective and enforceable instrument. The board may also recommend to the state construction code commission, after testing and evaluating a material, product, method of manufacture, or method of construction or installation for acceptability under the state construction code, that the commission issue a certificate of acceptability for that material, product, or method. Sec. 806. (1) A person shall not engage in the business of a mechanical contractor, journey mechanical technician, or apprentice mechanical technician unless that person is licensed or registered under this article. (2) Only a mechanical contractor or journey mechanical technician licensed under this article shall perform mechanical work. (3) A mechanical contractor licensed under this article is in charge and responsible for proper installation and conformance with the state construction code. Mechanical work must not be performed unless the mechanical contractor has secured the appropriate permits from this state or a governmental subdivision of this state authorized to issue permits. (4) An individual licensed under this article who is engaged in acceptance testing is exempt from licensure under article 11 for the specific purpose of acceptance testing. Sec. 807. (1) An applicant Until 2 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added subdivision (c), a mechanical contractor is not eligible for a work classification examination under this article unless the applicant meets the requirements provided in article 2, is of good moral character, and meets 1 or more of the following: (a) Has a minimum of 3 years or 6,000 hours of experience in the work classification for which he or she the applicant is seeking a license, or an equivalent of that experience, that is acceptable to the board and shown to the department, in 1 or more of the work classifications described in subsection (2). (3). For purposes of this subdivision, and except in the case of equivalent experience, an applicant must provide to the board and the department a statement signed under penalty of perjury from each contractor of record that is the present or former mechanical contractor employer of the applicant. The statement must indicate that the applicant has a minimum of 3 years or 6,000 hours of performance in each work classification for which the applicant is seeking a license and must include a detailed and specific description of the type of work performed by the applicant and the length of time he or she performed that work. (b) Currently holds, and has continuously held for at least not less than 3 years immediately preceding his or her the applicant's application, an active license under this act in a work classification listed in subsection (2)(b), (3)(b), (d), (e), or (f) and is applying for licensure in the following work classifications, as applicable: (i) If he or she the applicant currently holds a license in the work classification listed in subsection (2)(b), (3)(b), a work classification listed in subsection (2)(c), (3)(c), (e), (f), (g), (h), or (j). (ii) If he or she the applicant currently holds a license in the work classification listed in subsection (2)(d), (3)(d), a work classification listed in subsection (2)(f) (3)(f) or (h). (iii) If he or she the applicant currently holds a license in the work classification listed in subsection (2)(e), (3)(e), a work classification listed in subsection (2)(g).(3)(g). (iv) If he or she the applicant currently holds a license in the work classification listed in subsection (2)(f), (3)(f), a work classification listed in subsection (2)(h).(3)(h). (c) Currently holds, and has continuously held for at least 1 year immediately preceding the application, a boiler installer license issued by the department and is applying for licensure in the work classification listed in subsection (3)(a). (2) Beginning 2 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, a mechanical contractor is not eligible for a work classification examination under this article unless the applicant meets the requirements provided in article 2, is of good moral character, and meets 1 or more of the following: (a) Has a minimum of 4,000 hours of experience over a period of not less than 2 years immediately preceding the application as a licensed journey mechanical technician, or an equivalent of that experience, that is acceptable to the board and shown to the department, in 1 or more of the work classifications described in subsection (3). For purposes of this subdivision, and except in the case of equivalent experience, an applicant must provide to the board and the department a notarized statement signed under penalty of perjury from each mechanical contractor of record that is the current or former mechanical contractor employer of the applicant. The statement must indicate that the applicant has a minimum of 4,000 hours of performance in each work classification for which the applicant is seeking a license and must include a detailed and specific description of the type of work performed by the applicant and the length of time the applicant performed that work. (b) Currently holds, and has continuously held for at least 3 years immediately preceding the applicant's application, an active license under this act in a work classification listed in subsection (3)(b), (d), (e), or (f) and is applying for licensure in the following work classifications, as applicable: (i) If the applicant current holds a license in the work classification listed in subsection (3)(b), a work classification listed in subsection (3)(e), (f), (g), (h), or (j). (ii) If the applicant currently holds a license in the work classification listed in subsection (3)(d), a work classification listed in subsection (3)(f) or (h). (iii) If the applicant currently holds a license in the work classification listed in subsection (3)(e), a work classification listed in subsection (3)(g). (iv) If the applicant currently holds a license in the work classification listed in subsection (3)(f), a work classification listed in subsection (3)(h). (c) Currently holds, and has continuously held for at least 1 year immediately preceding the application, a boiler installer license issued by the department and is applying for licensure in the work classification listed in subsection (3)(a). (3) (2) The department shall issue a mechanical contractor's license under this article with 1 or more of the following classifications and limitations: (a) Hydronic heating and cooling and process piping. (b) HVAC equipment. (c) Ductwork. (d) Refrigeration. (e) Limited heating service. (f) Limited refrigeration and air conditioning service. (g) Unlimited heating service. (h) Unlimited refrigeration and air conditioning service. (i) Fire suppression. (j) Specialty. (4) (3) For purposes of subsection subsections (1) and (2), "experience" includes experience acquired while serving in the armed forces by an individual who provides to the department a form DD214, form DD215, or any other form satisfactory to the department that demonstrates that the individual was separated from that service with an honorable discharge or under honorable conditions (general). (5) (4) An individual described in subsection (3) (4) shall submit with his or her the individual's application for licensure an affidavit or letter signed by a commanding officer, supervisor, or military superior with direct knowledge of the applicant's service that describes the applicant's experience as a mechanical contractor in 1 or more of the classifications described in subsection (2).(3). (6) (5) If an applicant provides evidence satisfactory to the department that he or she the applicant has successfully completed a 2-year, or equivalent, HVAC program provided by a recognized trade school, community college, or university, or a 2-year HVAC training program approved by the United States Department of Labor, the department shall credit the completion of that program toward the 3 years or 6,000 hours of work experience required under subsection (1)(a) or (2)(a). The amount credited, as determined by the department, must not exceed 1 year or 2,000 hours. of the 3 years or 6,000 hours required. (7) If the state construction code is updated or changed, as a condition of renewal of a mechanical contractor's license, the mechanical contractor must demonstrate to the department the successful completion of a course, approved by the department, concerning the update or change to the state construction code not later than 12 months after the update or change. (8) A mechanical contractor license issued under this section is valid for 3 years. Sec. 808. (1) The department shall issue a journey mechanical technician license to an individual who meets the requirements provided in article 2 and all of the following: (a) Is not less than 18 years of age. (b) Has passed an examination provided for by the board. (c) Has not less than 6,000 hours of experience over a period of not less than 3 years immediately preceding as a registered apprentice mechanical technician in the work classification for which the applicant is seeking a license, or an equivalent of that experience that is acceptable to the board and shown to the department in 1 or more of the work classifications described in subsection (2). For purposes of this subdivision, and except in the case of equivalent experience, an applicant must provide to the board and the department a notarized statement signed under penalty of perjury from each mechanical contractor of record that is the current or former mechanical contractor employer of the applicant. The statement must indicate that the applicant has a minimum of 6,000 hours of performance in each work classification for which the applicant is seeking a license and must include a detailed and specific description of the type of work performed by the applicant and the length of time the applicant performed that work. (2) The department shall issue a journey mechanical technician license under this article with 1 or more of the following classifications and limitations: (a) Hydronic heating and cooling and process piping. (b) HVAC equipment. (c) Ductwork. (d) Refrigeration. (e) Limited heating service. (f) Limited refrigeration and air conditioning service. (g) Unlimited heating service. (h) Unlimited refrigeration and air conditioning service. (i) Specialty. (3) For purposes of subsection (1), "experience" includes experience acquired while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States by an individual who provides to the department a form DD214, form DD215, or any other form satisfactory to the department that demonstrates that the individual was separated from that service with an honorable discharge or under honorable conditions (general). (4) An individual described in subsection (3) shall submit with the individual's application for licensure an affidavit or letter signed by a commanding officer, supervisor, or military superior with direct knowledge of the applicant's service that describes the applicant's experience as a journey mechanical technician in 1 or more of the classifications described in subsection (2). (5) If an applicant provides evidence satisfactory to the department that the applicant has successfully completed a 2-year, or equivalent, HVAC program provided by a recognized trade school, community college, or university, or a 2-year HVAC training program approved by the United States Department of Labor, the department shall credit the completion of that program toward the 6,000 hours of work experience required under subsection (1). The amount credited, as determined by the department, must not exceed 1 year or 2,000 hours of the 6,000 hours required. (6) A journey mechanical technician license issued under this section is valid for 3 years. Sec. 808a. (1) The department shall issue an apprentice mechanical technician registration to an individual who registers with the department on a form provided by the department not later than 30 days after being employed. (2) An apprentice mechanical technician shall, as the technician's principal occupation, be engaged in learning and assisting in mechanical work under the direct on-site supervision of a journey mechanical technician or mechanical contractor. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this article, an application under subsection (1) must include an application fee of $15.00. (4) An apprentice mechanical technician registration issued under this section is valid for 3 years. Sec. 809. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) or (4) and section 819, an individual or other person shall not perform installations, alterations, or servicing of work classifications under section 807(2) 807(3) that are regulated under the Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code act unless the person, if the person is an individual, or an employee of the person has received a mechanical contractor's license from the department that has not been revoked or suspended, the license is classified and limited under section 807, and the holder of the license has secured the appropriate permit from the enforcing agency charged with the responsibility of issuing permits. (2) A person that performs installations, alterations, or servicing of work classifications under section 807(2) 807(3) shall designate the holder of a mechanical contractor's license described in subsection (1) as the contractor of record and notify the department in writing of the designation. (3) If work that is within 1 of the classifications described in section 807(2) 807(3) is performed without compensation by a person that is licensed under this article for or on behalf of a charitable organization, the owner of the property on which the work is performed may obtain the permit required under subsection (1). However, this subsection applies only to the reconstruction, renovation, or remodeling of 1- to 4-family dwellings. (4) A person that is registered as a system provider under the security alarm systems act, 2012 PA 580, MCL 338.2181 to 338.2187, or licensed as a security alarm system contractor under the private security business and security alarm act, 1968 PA 330, MCL 338.1051 to 338.1092, is not required to obtain a license from the department under this article or obtain a license or permit from a governmental subdivision or enforcing agency to perform work described in subsection (1) in connection with the installation, maintenance, replacement, or servicing of a thermostat for a heating, ventilating, and air conditioning system or a hydronic heating and cooling system. (5) If a contractor of record regularly employs a qualified maintenance crew to perform mechanical contracting work regulated under this article in a facility, this article does not require that the contractor of record perform work in that facility. Sec. 811. A municipality shall not establish or maintain local licensing requirements for the work classifications described in section 807(2) 807(3) or work described in section 809(4). A governmental subdivision shall not prohibit a mechanical contractor that is licensed under this article from engaging in the work classification or classifications for which the mechanical contractor has a license, or a person described in section 809(4) from engaging in work for which that person is licensed or registered, unless the mechanical contractor is in violation of this act. Sec. 813. (1) Each work classification examination The initial, annual, and renewal fee for a journey mechanical technician license is $40.00 and for an apprentice mechanical technician registration is $15.00. (2) An individual who fails to renew a journey mechanical technician license or an apprentice mechanical technician registration before the expiration date may renew the license or registration only by applying to the department for relicensure or reregistration and paying the annual fee under subsection (1) and the following fee: (a) For a journey mechanical technician license, $50.00. (b) For an apprentice mechanical technician registration, $20.00. (3) Examination fees for a license issued under this act are as follows: (a) For a mechanical contractor's license, is $100.00. or less, as determined by the department. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the initial and per-year fee for the issuance of a mechanical contractor's license is (b) For an apprentice mechanical technician license, $100.00. (c) For a journey mechanical technician license, $100.00. (4) (2) An initial or renewal mechanical contractor's license expires on August 31 every third year and is renewable by filing an application and paying the license fee on or before October 31. If an individual is applying for an initial mechanical contractor's license or relicensure additional classifications at a time other than between August 31 and October 31 of the year in which the department issues renewal licenses, the department shall compute and charge the license fee on a yearly pro rata prorated basis beginning in the year of the application until the last year of the 3-year license cycle. A (5) The initial and renewal fee for a mechanical contractor license issued under this article is $300.00. (6) An individual who fails to renew a mechanical contractor license that is not renewed is void for the purpose of obtaining a permit, and the contractor is eligible for relicensure before the expiration date of the license may renew the license only by applying for reinstatement to the board and paying the license renewal fee and a $100.00 late fee. The department shall not compute and charge a license fee for a renewal license on a pro rata basis. An individual who renews his or her license within 3 years after the license is voided under this section is not subject to reexamination for the license. Sec. 814. (1) Subject to subsection (2), the department shall issue a sprinkler fitter journeyperson license to an individual who meets the requirements provided in article 2 and provides both of the following to the department: (a) A notarized statement signed under penalty of perjury from each of the applicant's current or former employers, verifying that the applicant has not less than 4 years of knowledge and experience in automatic fire suppression system installation. (b) Documentation that indicates the individual has completed a registered fire sprinkler program. (2) Beginning 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall issue a sprinkler fitter journeyperson license to an individual who meets the requirements provided in article 2 and meets all of the following: (a) The individual has not less than 4 years of automatic fire suppression system installation experience. To satisfy the requirement described in this subdivision, the individual must provide a certified letter from the applicable employer or employers that, in total, indicate the individual gained the required amount of experience in automatic fire suppression system installation during the individual's employment with the employer or employers. (b) The individual completed a registered fire sprinkler program. (c) The individual passed a sprinkler fitter journeyperson exam approved by the department. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this article, an application under subsection (1) or (2) must include an application fee of $300.00. (4) A sprinkler fitter journeyperson license issued under this section is valid for 3 years. (5) A sprinkler fitter journeyperson may renew a license issued under this section by filing an application with the department on a form approved by the department before the expiration date of the license. An application must include an affirmation that the applicant has obtained the required hours of continuing education under section 814a during the applicant's current license term. (6) An individual seeking a license renewal under subsection (5) is subject to a compliance audit by the department. If the department finds, as a result of an audit, that the individual did not complete the required amount of hours of continuing education, the sanction imposed by the department must require the individual to complete both of the following, as applicable: (a) Continuing education that fulfills the requirements for the period determined by the audit to be deficient. (b) If the period determined by the audit to be deficient is not less than 60 days, additional hours of continuing education as follows: (i) If the deficiency period is less than 120 days, 4 hours. (ii) If the deficiency period is 120 days or more, 8 hours. (7) The additional hours of continuing education described in subsection (6)(b) do not apply toward the continuing education required under section 814a. The department may waive the sanction under subsection (6) if the individual subject to the sanction demonstrates to the department that the sanction would cause undue hardship for the individual. Sec. 814a. (1) A sprinkler fitter journeyperson shall complete not less than 24 hours of continuing education per license cycle. (2) Continuing education required under subsection (1) includes any of the following that relate to automatic fire suppression system installation: (a) A workshop, seminar, or education conference that is approved or sponsored by any of the following: (i) AFSA, or a successor organization. (ii) An automatic fire suppression system manufacturer. (iii) The department. (iv) NFSA, or a successor organization. (b) A course in specialized programs approved or sponsored by the department. (c) A distance learning, video, or correspondence course approved or sponsored by the department. (d) Continuing education that has been obtained in another state and is approved by the department. (e) College or vocational school coursework that is approved by the department. (3) Not later than 30 days before a sponsor of continuing education other than the department conducts continuing education, the sponsor shall register the continuing education with the department. A registration must include all of the following: (a) The name and contact information of the sponsor. (b) The continuing education's title and field of study. (c) The date that the continuing education will begin to be conducted. (d) A statement, signed by the sponsor or on behalf of the sponsor, stating that continuing education credit will be granted on a 50-minute hour or, if the continuing education is college or vocational school coursework, that 1 semester of course credit equals 8 hours of continuing education credit. (e) Payment for a $30.00 registration fee. (4) An individual shall, for not less than 4 years after the date of completion of continuing education, retain a record that demonstrates the individual completed the continuing education. (5) On request by the department, an individual shall provide all of the following: (a) The name and contact information of the continuing education sponsor. (b) The continuing education's title and field of study. (c) The date that the continuing education was offered or completed. (d) The location of the continuing education, if applicable. (e) From the continuing education sponsor, a statement that includes all of the following: (i) The number of hours of instruction for the continuing education. (ii) That the individual completed or passed the continuing education. (iii) That continuing education credit was granted on a 50-minute hour or, if the continuing education was college or vocational school coursework, that 1 semester of course credit equals 8 hours of continuing education credit. Sec. 814b. (1) The department shall issue an apprentice sprinkler fitter technician registration to an individual who meets the requirements provided in article 2 and all of the following: (a) Is not less than 17 years of age. (b) Is not a licensed sprinkler fitter journeyperson. (c) Is enrolled in a registered fire sprinkler program. (d) Is employed by a fire sprinkler contractor. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this article, an application under subsection (1) must include an application fee of $100.00. (3) An apprentice sprinkler fitter technician registration issued under this section is valid for 1 year. (4) An apprentice sprinkler fitter technician shall not do either of the following: (a) Perform automatic fire suppression system installation without the direct, on-site supervision of a sprinkler fitter journeyperson. (b) Be employed by more than 1 mechanical contractor with a fire suppression classification at the same time. (5) The ratio of sprinkler fitter journeypersons to apprentice sprinkler fitter technicians on a jobsite must be 2 sprinkler fitter journeypersons to 1 apprentice sprinkler fitter technician. The department or an enforcing agency shall enforce the ratio on a jobsite basis. Sec. 815. (1) If an individual who is an employee of a person, or who is an officer of a person that is not an individual, and who is authorized to perform installations, alterations, or servicing in any of the work classifications described in section 807(2), 807(3), is designated as the contractor of record for that person under section 809 and ceases to be an employee or officer of that person, the person has 90 days after the date the contractor of record ceases to be an employee or officer in which to designate an employee or officer who is a holder of a mechanical contractor's license as the new contractor of record. The person shall notify the department in writing of the designation. (2) If an individual is licensed to perform installations, alterations, or servicing in 1 or more of the work classifications described in section 807(2) 807(3) and is also the contractor of record, and that individual ceases to do business as a mechanical contractor and sells his or her the individual's business interest to another person, the buyer has 90 days to designate an employee or officer who is the holder of a mechanical contractor's license as the contractor of record. The buyer shall notify the department in writing of the designation. Sec. 819. (1) An individual who is the owner of a single family single-family dwelling that is, or on completion will become, his or her the individual's place of residence may personally install a heating or refrigerating system in the dwelling if the individual in his or her the individual's application for a permit affirms that he or she the applicant is or will become the owner and occupant of the dwelling in which the installation is done is completed and that the applicant will install the equipment in the dwelling for which the permit is requested. The applicant shall apply for and secure the required permits from the enforcing agency of the municipality and shall obtain the required inspection after the installation is completed and the equipment is placed in operation. (2) An individual who is the owner of a single-family dwelling is not required to obtain a license under this article to perform the installation of the individual's own mechanical conveyance in the individual's single-family dwelling if the required permits are secured by the individual. (3) If work that is within 1 of the work classifications described in section 807(3) is performed without compensation by an individual who is licensed under this article for or on behalf of a charitable organization, the owner of the property on which the work is performed may obtain the required permits. This subsection applies only to the reconstruction, renovation, or remodeling of 1- to 2-family dwellings. (4) A person that is registered as a system provider under the security alarm systems act, 2012 PA 580, MCL 338.2181 to 338.2187, or licensed as a security alarm system contractor under the private security business and security alarm act, 1968 PA 330, MCL 338.1051 to 338.1092, is not required to obtain a license under this article or obtain a license or permit from a governmental subdivision or enforcing agency to perform work described in this section in connection with the installation, maintenance, replacement, or servicing of a thermostat for an HVAC system or a hydronic heating and cooling system. (5) The following are not required to obtain a license or registration under this article: (a) An individual who is performing an automatic fire suppression system inspection or automatic fire suppression system maintenance test, in accordance with the state building code, to determine the operational status of an automatic fire suppression system only. (b) An individual who is acting on behalf of a fire inspector.